North Carolina statutes. Chapter 31. Wills.
Article 1. Execution of Will.

§ 31-1.
Who may make will.

Any person of sound mind, and 18 years of age or over, may make a will.

History.

1811, c. 280; R.C., c. 119, s. 2; Code, s. 2137; Rev., s. 3111; C.S., s. 4128; 1953, c. 1098, s. 1; 1965, c. 303; 1969, c. 39.

Legal Periodicals.

For article on drafting and probate of wills, see 23 N.C.L. Rev. 306 (1945).

For comment on the 1953 amendments to this Chapter, see 31 N.C.L. Rev. 444 (1953).

For article on medication as a threat to testamentary capacity, see 35 N.C.L. Rev. 380 (1957).

For case law survey on wills and administration, see 41 N.C.L. Rev. 530 (1963).

For article, “The Contracts of Minors Viewed from the Perspective of Fair Exchange,” see 50 N.C.L. Rev. 517 (1972).

For note as to the transfer of land by wills in light of Stephenson v. Rowe,

315 N.C. 330

, 338 S.E.2d 301 (1986), see 65 N.C.L. Rev. 1488 (1987).

For article, “Abolishing the Attestation Requirement for Wills,” see 68 N.C.L. Rev. 541 (1990).

For comment on the standard of mental capacity in North Carolina for legal transactions of the elderly, see 32 Wake Forest L. Rev. 563 (1997).

§ 31-2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1953, c. 1098, s. 1.

§ 31-3.
[Repealed]

Rewritten and renumbered as

G.S. 31-3.1

to 31-3.6 by Session Laws 1953, c. 1098, s. 2.

§ 31-3.1.
Will invalid unless statutory requirements complied with.

No will is valid unless it complies with the requirements prescribed therefor by this Article.

History.

1953, c. 1098, s. 2.

Legal Periodicals.

For article on what is sufficient subscription, what are valuable papers, what is meant by depositing with someone for safekeeping, and animus testandi, see 2 N.C.L. Rev. 107 (1924).

§ 31-3.2.
Kinds of wills.

Personal property and real property may be devised by

An attested written will which complies with the requirements of

G.S. 31-3.3

, or

A holographic will which complies with the requirements of

G.S. 31-3.4

.

Personal property may also be devised by a nuncupative will which complies with the requirements of

G.S. 31-3.5

.

History.

1953, c. 1098, s. 2; 2011-284, s. 26.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-284, s. 26, effective June 24, 2011, deleted “may be bequeathed” following “property” in the introductory language of subsection (a); and substituted “devised” for “bequeathed” in subsection (b).

§ 31-3.3.
Attested written will.

An attested written will is a written will signed by the testator and attested by at least two competent witnesses as provided by this section.

The testator must, with intent to sign the will, do so by actually signing the will or by having someone else in the testator’s presence and at the testator’s direction sign the testator’s name thereon.

The testator must signify to the attesting witnesses that the instrument is the testator’s instrument by signing it in their presence or by acknowledging to them the testator’s signature previously affixed thereto, either of which may be done before the attesting witnesses separately.

The attesting witnesses must sign the will in the presence of the testator but need not sign in the presence of each other.

History.

1953, c. 1098, s. 2; 2011-344, s. 8.

Cross References.

As to manner of probate of attested written will, see G.S. 28A-2A-8.

As to witnesses to will, see

G.S. 31-8.1

through 31-10.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-344, s. 8, effective January 1, 2012, and applicable to estates of decedents dying on or after that date, substituted “by actually signing the will or” for “by signing the will himself or” and “the testator’s” for “his” in subsection (b), and substituted “the testator’s” for “his” twice in subsection (c).

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on the necessity for proof of due execution of a will, see 3 Wake Forest Intra. L. Rev. 12 (1967).

For comment, “Over My Dead Body: The Legal Nightmare and Medical Phenomenon of Posthumous Conception Through Postmortem Sperm Retrieval,” see 34 Campbell L. Rev. 181 (2011).

§ 31-3.4.
Holographic will.

A holographic will is a will that meets all of the following requirements:

Written entirely in the handwriting of the testator but when all the words appearing on a paper in the handwriting of the testator are sufficient to constitute a valid holographic will, the fact that other words or printed matter appear thereon not in the handwriting of the testator, and not affecting the meaning of the words in the handwriting, does not affect the validity of the will.

Subscribed by the testator, or with the testator’s name written in or on the will in the testator’s own handwriting.

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-85, s. 1(b), effective July 8, 2021, and applicable to estates of decedents dying on or after that date.

No attesting witness to a holographic will is required.

History.

1953, c. 1098, s. 2; 1955, c. 73, s. 1; 2011-344, s. 8; 2021-85, s. 1(b).

Cross References.

As to manner of probate of holographic will, see G.S. 28A-2A-9.

§ 31-3.5.
Nuncupative will.

A nuncupative will is a will

Made orally by a person who is in that person’s last sickness or in imminent peril of death and who does not survive such sickness or imminent peril, and

Declared to be that person’s will before two competent witnesses simultaneously present at the making thereof and specially requested by the person to bear witness thereto.

History.

1953, c. 1098, s. 2; 2011-344, s. 8.

Cross References.

As to manner of probate of nuncupative will, see G.S. 28A-2A-10.

As to revocation of nuncupative will, see

G.S. 31-5.2

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-344, s. 8, effective January 1, 2012, and applicable to estates of decedents dying on or after that date, throughout the section, substituted “that person’s” for “his,” or similar language.

§ 31-3.6.
Seal not required.

A seal is not necessary to the validity of a will.

History.

1953, c. 1098, s. 2.

§ 31-4.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-205, s. 3(b), effective August 11, 2015.

History.

1844, c. 88, s. 9; R.C., c. 119, s. 4; Code, s. 2139; Rev., s. 3114; C.S., s. 4132; repealed by 2015-205, s. 3(b), effective August 11, 2015.

§ 31-4.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2010-181, s. 1, effective July 1, 2010.

History.

2009-182, ss. 1, 3; repealed by 2010-181, s. 1, effective July 1, 2010.

§ 31-4.2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2010-181, s. 2, effective July 1, 2010.

History.

2009-182, s. 2; repealed by 2010-181, s. 2, effective July 1, 2010.